Alabama, session 2026rs, HB602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Rural Allied Health Professional Workforce Expansion Act.
Section 2. It is the intent of this Legislature to
Page 1

Section 2. It is the intent of this Legislature to
HB602 INTRODUCED
provide opportunities and funding to expand and support the
pipeline of allied health professionals serving rural and
underserved communities.
Section 3. For the purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) ALLIED HEALTH PROFESSIONAL. A health professional,
not including a registered nurse or physician assistant, who:
a. has received a certificate, an associate's degree, a
bachelor's degree, a master's degree, a doctoral degree, or
postbaccalaureate training, in a science relating to health
care;
b. shares in the responsibility for the delivery of
health care services or related services, including:
1. services relating to the identification, evaluation,
and prevention of disease and disorders;
2. dietary and nutrition services;
3. health promotion services;
4. rehabilitation services; or
5. health systems management services; and
c. has not received a degree of doctor of medicine, a
degree of doctor of osteopathy, a degree of doctor of
dentistry or an equivalent degree, a degree of doctor of
veterinary medicine or an equivalent degree, a degree of
doctor of optometry or an equivalent degree, a degree of
doctor of podiatric medicine or an equivalent degree, a degree
of bachelor of science in pharmacy or an equivalent degree, a
degree of doctor of pharmacy or an equivalent degree, a
graduate degree in public health or an equivalent degree, a
Page 2

graduate degree in public health or an equivalent degree, a
HB602 INTRODUCED
degree of doctor of chiropractic or an equivalent degree, a
graduate degree in health administration or an equivalent
degree, a doctoral degree in clinical psychology or an
equivalent degree, a degree in social work or an equivalent
degree, or a degree in counseling or an equivalent degree.
(2) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Public
Health.
(3) ELIGIBLE TRAINING PROGRAMS. Programs taught at a
public or nonprofit private, two-year or four-year institution
of higher education that provides programs of education to
individuals to become allied health professionals.
(4) MEDICALLY UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY. An urban or rural
area or population that is eligible for designation under 42
USC §254(e) as a health professional shortage area, or is
designated by the Governor or the department as a shortage
area.
Section 4. (a) The Department shall administer a
program to provide either of the following:
(1) Tuition grants for students enrolled in eligible
training programs.
(2) Loan forgiveness for licensed graduates who commit
to at least two years of practice in a medically underserved
area.
(b) Priority shall be given to applicants with rural
backgrounds or demonstrated interest in rural service.
Section 5. (a) Rural Clinical Training Partnership Fund
is established in the State Treasury and shall be maintained
by the department.
Page 3

by the department.
HB602 INTRODUCED
(b) Monies collected pursuant to this act shall be
deposited to the State Treasury to the credit of the Rural
Clinical Training Partnership Fund of the department. Amounts
deposited into the fund shall be budgeted and allotted in
accordance with Sections 41-4-80 through 41-4-96 and Sections
41-19-1 through 41-19-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
(c) Monies in the fund, at the discretion of the
department, shall be used exclusively for financial assistance
for grants to accredited health profession programs that:
(1) Establish or expand clinical rotation agreements
with rural providers;
(2) Recruit and train rural preceptors; and
(3) Deliver interprofessional training modules tailored
to rural health.
(d) Funds may support faculty stipends, travel costs,
100 and clinical coordination.
101 (e) The department, before the 15th legislative day of
102 each regular session of the Legislature, shall submit a report
103 to the Legislature detailing the disbursements and uses of
104 monies from the fund in the previous calendar year.
105 Section 6. (a) The department, in consultation with the
106 Alabama Department of Workforce, shall fund the creation or
107 expansion of satellite training centers or mobile simulation
108 units to reach rural learners, which may include purchasing
109 equipment, hiring instructional staff, and curriculum
110 development.
111 Section 7. (a) The department shall create the Paid
112 Rural Health Internships Program, which will provide stipends
Page 4

Rural Health Internships Program, which will provide stipends
HB602 INTRODUCED
113 of up to five thousand ($5,000) per student for internships or
114 externships conducted in rural clinical settings.
115 (b) Host facilities must provide structured mentorship
116 and meaningful hands-on experience.
117 Section 8. (a) The department, in consultation and
118 coordination with the Alabama Department of Workforce, shall
119 conduct annual data collection and publish a report on:
120 (1) Enrollment and graduation rates in rural-serving
121 programs;
122 (2) Clinical placement availability by region; and
123 (3) Workforce shortages and projected demand.
124 (b) The report shall inform future program planning and
125 investment.
126 Section 9. This act shall become effective on October
127 1, 2026.
Page 5